Missouri, session 2026, HB3523.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 217, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 217.995, to read as follows:
217.995. 1. There is hereby established within the department of corrections the
"Homes for Missouri Program". Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the
contrary, the director is authorized to contract with nonprofit entities for inmate work
involving the construction of single-family homes and other residential structures in
areas within the state with documented affordable housing shortages with such single-
family homes and other structures to be sold at below-market, cost-based prices.
2. The department may contract with one or more nonprofit organizations to
administer, manage, market, or otherwise operate the program. Any contract
authorized under this section shall be in compliance with state and federal law.
3. Participation in the program shall be voluntary and contingent upon
eligibility criteria established by the department.
4. The program shall incorporate structured vocational training and workforce
development components including, but not limited to:
(1) On the job training in residential construction trades including, but not
limited to, carpentry, electrical work, plumbing, masonry, framing, and roofing;
(2) Classroom instruction integrated with hands-on construction experience;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3523 2
(3) Opportunities to earn industry-recognized credentials and certifications
including, but not limited to, Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA)
safety certifications, National Center for Construction Education and Research
(NCCER) credentials, apprenticeship hours recognized by the Missouri department of
labor and industrial relations, and other credentials approved by the department; and
(4) Documentation of hours worked and competencies achieved to assist
participants in securing post-release employment.
5. The director of the department of corrections may promulgate all necessary
rules and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
6. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly; and
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset.
✔